Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.210

ESD board—Payment of member expenses—Payment of dues into statewide association of board members, restrictions.

In addition to other powers and duties prescribed by law every educational service district board shall be authorized to:

(1) Pay the expenses of its members in accordance with law for attendance at statewide meetings of educational service district board members.

(2) Pay dues from educational service district funds in an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars per board member per year for membership in a statewide association of educational service district board members: PROVIDED, That dues to such an association shall not be paid unless the formation of such an association, including its constitution and bylaws, is approved by a resolution passed by at least two-thirds of the educational service district boards within the state: PROVIDED FURTHER, That such association if formed shall not employ any staff but shall contract either with the Washington state school directors' association or with the superintendent of public instruction for staff and informational services.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 19; 1971 ex.s. c 282 s 14. Formerly RCW 28A.21.092.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 282: See note following RCW 28A.310.010.